Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 3. Competitive Sealed Proposals.

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

For competitive sealed proposals for architect, engineer, or land surveying services, see 2 AAC 12, art. 5.

Sec. 36.30.200.
Conditions for use.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, or unless specifically exempted by law, an agency contract shall be awarded by competitive sealed proposals if it is not awarded by competitive sealed bidding.

The commissioner may provide by regulation that it is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state to procure specified types of supplies, services, or construction by competitive sealed bidding that would otherwise be procured by that method. When the procurement officer determines in writing with particularity that the use of competitive sealed proposals is more advantageous to the state than competitive sealed bidding, a contract may be entered into by competitive sealed proposals.

When the commissioner of transportation and public facilities determines that it is advantageous to the state, a procurement officer may issue a request for proposals requesting the submission of offers to provide

construction in accordance with a design provided by the offeror; request for proposals issued under this paragraph must require that each proposal submitted contain a single price that includes the design-build; or

preconstruction and construction services under a single construction manager general contractor contract awarded under AS

36.30.309

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 15 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

For design-build construction contracts, see 2 AAC 12, art. 16.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 15, 2021, in (c)(1), inserted “issued under this paragraph” following “request for proposals”, added (c)(2), and made related and stylistic changes.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 22, SLA 2021 (HB 160), which amended (a) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 493 — 494.

Sec. 36.30.210.
Request for proposals.

A request for competitive sealed proposals must contain the date, time, and place for delivering proposals, a specific description of the supplies, construction, services, or professional services to be provided under the contract, and the terms under which the supplies, construction, services, or professional services are to be provided.

An offeror for a construction contract shall submit proof of the offeror’s registration as a contractor under AS 08.18 before the contract may be awarded. A request for sealed proposals for a construction contract, except a design-build construction contract, must require the offeror, not later than five working days after the proposal that is the most advantageous to the state is identified, to list subcontractors the offeror proposes to use in the performance of the construction contract. The list must include the information required under AS

36.30.115(a)

. The provisions of AS

36.30.115(b)

— (g) that apply to a construction contractor or an apparent low bidder apply to offerors submitting competitive sealed proposals for construction contracts, except design-build construction contracts.

A request for proposals must contain that information necessary for an offeror to submit a proposal or contain references to any information that cannot reasonably be included with the request. The request must provide a description of the factors that will be considered by the procurement officer when evaluating the proposals received, including the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors.

Notice of a request for proposals shall be given in accordance with procedures under AS

36.30.130

. The procurement officer may use additional means considered appropriate to notify prospective offerors of the intent to enter into a contract through competitive sealed proposals.

The offeror shall have a valid Alaska business license at the time the contract is awarded. To qualify as an Alaska bidder under AS

36.30.321

, an offeror shall have a valid Alaska business license at the time designated in the request for proposals for opening of the proposals.

In this section, “construction contractor” has the meaning given in AS

36.30.115

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 65 SLA 1987; am §§ 7, 8 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 16 ch 137 SLA 1996; am §§ 3, 4 ch 35 SLA 1999; am § 38 ch 134 SLA 2003; am §§ 15, 16 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

Sec. 36.30.220.
Standard overhead rate.

An agency that provides services to another agency under a contract covered by this chapter shall establish a standard overhead rate. If an agency submits a proposal in response to a request for competitive sealed proposals, the agency must include its standard overhead rate within its proposal.

In this section, “standard overhead rate” means a charge established for services and professional services from an agency that is designed to compensate the agency for administration and support services incidentally provided with the services contracted for.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 36.30.230.
Disclosure of proposals; return of proposals.

The procurement officer shall open proposals so as to avoid disclosure of contents to competing offerors before notice of intent to award a contract is issued. A register of proposals containing the name and address of each offeror shall be prepared in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner. The register and the proposals are open for public inspection after the notice of intent to award a contract is issued under AS

36.30.365

. To the extent that the offeror designates and the procurement officer concurs, trade secrets and other proprietary data contained in the proposal documents are confidential.

If a solicitation is cancelled under AS

36.30.350

after proposals are received but before a notice of intent to award a contract has been issued under AS

36.30.365

, a protest of the solicitation or of the cancellation of the solicitation has not been filed by an interested party under AS

36.30.560

, and the time specified in AS

36.30.565(a)

for filing such a protest has expired, the procurement officer may return a proposal to the offeror that made the proposal. The procurement officer shall keep a list of returned proposals in the file for the solicitation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am §§ 17, 18 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

For innovative procurement, see 2 AAC 12, art. 11.

Sec. 36.30.240.
Discussion with responsible offerors and revisions to proposals.

As provided in the request for proposals, and under regulations adopted by the commissioner, discussions may be conducted with responsible offerors who submit proposals determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award for the purpose of clarification to assure full understanding of, and responsiveness to, the solicitation requirements. Offerors reasonably susceptible of being selected for award shall be accorded fair and equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion and revision of proposals, and revisions may be permitted after submissions and before the award of the contract for the purpose of obtaining best and final offers. In conducting discussions, the procurement officer may not disclose information derived from proposals submitted by competing offerors. AS

44.62.310

does not apply to meetings with offerors under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

Sec. 36.30.250.
Award of contract.

The procurement officer shall award a contract under competitive sealed proposals to the responsible and responsive offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and the evaluation factors set out in the request for proposals. Other factors and criteria may not be used in the evaluation. The contract file must contain the basis on which the award is made.

[Repealed, § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 114 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 2010; am § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals, see 2 AAC 12, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 15, 2021, added (c).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 22, SLA 2021 (HB 160), which added (c) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 493 — 494.

Sec. 36.30.250.
Award of contract.

The procurement officer shall award a contract under competitive sealed proposals to the responsible and responsive offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and the evaluation factors set out in the request for proposals. Other factors and criteria may not be used in the evaluation. The contract file must contain the basis on which the award is made.

[Repealed, § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013.]

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may include factors in addition to price as evaluation factors when awarding a construction manager general contractor contract under AS

36.30.309

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 102 SLA 1989; am § 4 ch 114 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 2010; am § 26 ch 59 SLA 2013; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2021)

Sec. 36.30.260.
Contract contents.

A contract awarded under competitive sealed proposals must contain

a statement of the amount of the contract;

the date for the supplies to be delivered or the dates for construction, services, or professional services to begin and be completed;

a description of the supplies, construction, services, or professional services to be provided; and

certification by the project director for the contracting agency, the head of the contracting agency, or a designee that sufficient money is available in an appropriation to be encumbered for the amount of the contract.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 137 SLA 1996)

Sec. 36.30.265.
Multi-step sealed proposals.

When it is considered impractical to initially prepare a definitive purchase description to support an award based on listed selection criteria, the procurement officer may issue an expression of interest requesting the submission of unpriced technical offers, and then later issue a request for proposals limited to the offerors whose offers are determined to be technically qualified under the criteria set out in the expression of interest.

History.

(§ 10 ch 102 SLA 1989)

Sec. 36.30.270.
Architectural, engineering, and land surveying contracts.

Notwithstanding conflicting provisions of AS

36.30.100

—

36.30.260

, a procurement officer shall negotiate a contract for an agency with the most qualified and suitable firm or person of demonstrated competence for architectural, engineering, or land surveying services. The procurement officer shall award a contract for those services at fair and reasonable compensation as determined by the procurement officer, after consideration of the estimated value of the services to be rendered, and the scope, complexity, and professional nature of the services. When determining the most qualified and suitable firm or person, the procurement officer shall consider the

proximity to the project site of the office of the firm or person unless federal law prohibits this factor from being considered in the awarding of the contract; and

employment practices of the firm or person with regard to women and minorities.

If negotiations with the most qualified and suitable firm or person under (a) of this section are not successful, the procurement officer shall negotiate a contract with other qualified firms or persons of demonstrated competence, in order of public ranking. The procurement officer may reject all or part of a proposal.

This section does not apply to contracts awarded in a situation of public necessity if the procurement officer certifies in writing that a situation of public necessity exists.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a procurement officer may include price as an added factor in selecting architectural, engineering, and land surveying services when, in the judgment of the procurement officer, the services required are repetitious in nature, and the scope, nature, and amount of services required are thoroughly defined by measurable and objective standards to reasonably enable firms or persons making proposals to compete with a clear understanding and interpretation of the services required. In order to include price as a factor in selection, a majority of the persons involved by the procurement officer in evaluation of the proposals must be registered in the state to perform architectural, engineering, or land surveying services.

This section does not apply to a contract that incorporates both design services and construction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For professional registration requirements for contracts under this section, see AS

36.90.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For competitive sealed proposals for architect, engineer, or land surveying, see 2 AAC 12, art. 5.